Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,106
Functions of officers.

(MBCA 8.41) Each officer
has the authority and shall perform the functions set forth in the bylaws
or, to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the functions prescribed by
the board of directors or by direction of an officer authorized by the board
of directors to prescribe the functions of other officers.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 106.